Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Commission

§ 15-4-101.
Governing body; composition; powers; manner of adopting motions; president; vice-president; duties.

The governing body of each city and town operating under the commission form of government consists of the mayor and two (2) commissioners, each of whom has the right to vote on all questions coming before the governing body. Two (2) members of the council constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of two (2) members is necessary to adopt any motion, resolution or ordinance, or pass any measure, unless a greater number is otherwise provided. Upon every vote the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded, and every motion, resolution or ordinance shall be reduced to writing and read before the vote is taken thereon.

The mayor has no power to veto any measure, but every resolution or ordinance passed by the council, before it is in force, must be signed by the mayor, or by two (2) commissioners and be recorded.

The mayor is president of the governing body. The commissioner of finances and public property is vice-president of the governing body and shall perform the duties of the mayor in his absence.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 204; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-204; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring minutes of proceedings of governing body to be published, see §

15-1-110

.

Sufficient notice to protect equity affected by zoning. —

Where mayor, before annexation of territory by city, was informed, by legal owner of part thereof, of sale of some of it specifically for business purposes, and after annexation but before its zoning for residence purposes, council was notified of existence of such equity by purchaser, and, after zoning ordinance for residence purposes only was passed, such purchaser applied for and was successively denied permit for business purposes, notice was sufficient to protect his equity, though contract was not of record and plat in annexation proceedings mentioned no restrictions. Weber v. Cheyenne, 55 Wyo. 202, 97 P.2d 667,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 15-4-102.
Departments; powers; administrators.

The executive and administrative powers, authority and duties in cities and towns adopting this form of government shall be distributed among three (3) departments, as follows:

Department of public affairs and safety, to be administered by the mayor;

Department of accounts, finance, parks and public property, to be administered by the commissioner of finances and public property;

Department of streets and public improvements, to be administered by the commissioner of streets and public improvements.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 205; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-205; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-4-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

The section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 206, pertained to police judges.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 15-4-104.
Officers and assistants; election and removal; vote required; duties.

The governing body, at its first meeting, or as soon as practicable thereafter, shall elect by majority vote the following officers or as many thereof as may be necessary:

City clerk;

Attorney;

Treasurer;

Civil engineer;

Health officer;

Chief of police;

Chief of fire department; and

Any other officers and assistants as are provided for by ordinance and necessary to the proper and efficient conduct of the city’s affairs.

Any officer or assistant elected or appointed may be removed from office at any time by a majority vote of the council, and their duties shall be fixed by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 207; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-207; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers in incorporated towns, see §

15-2-102

.

As to appointed officers in cities of the first class, see §

15-3-204

.

As to positions in cities operating under a city manager form of government, see §

15-4-202

.

§ 15-4-105.
Officers and employees; offices; office hours; salaries.

The mayor, commissioners and other officers as provided by ordinance shall have offices in the city hall and shall maintain regular office hours to be fixed by ordinance. The compensation of the city officers shall be paid in monthly installments not to exceed the following maximum amounts per year:

Mayor, seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000.00);

Commissioner, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00);

City clerk, nineteen thousand dollars ($19,000.00);

City attorney, nineteen thousand two hundred dollars ($19,200.00);

City engineer, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00);

Police judge, six thousand dollars ($6,000.00).

The annual salaries specified in subsection (a) of this section may be fixed by ordinance at any amount less than the maximum amount specified. No salary of any elective officer may be changed during his term of office. The salary or compensation of other officers and employees, except as otherwise provided by law, shall be fixed by ordinance and payable in equal monthly installments or more often.

In cities and towns having an assessed valuation of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000.00) or less, the annual salaries shall not exceed the following:

Mayor, fifteen thousand three hundred dollars ($15,300.00);

Commissioner, four thousand six hundred twenty dollars ($4,620.00);

City clerk, four thousand three hundred dollars ($4,300.00);

City attorney, three thousand six hundred dollars ($3,600.00);

City engineer, four thousand three hundred dollars ($4,300.00); and

Police judge, one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 208; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-208; Laws 1971, ch. 46, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 8, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of said officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

§ 15-4-106.
Officers and employees; salaries; verified payroll.

In cities operating under a commission government, payment of wages and salary of city officers, laborers, firemen, police officers and other employees or officers of any city department may be made upon approval by the governing body of a payroll verified by the oath of the city clerk as to city officers, and the oaths of the mayor and city commissioners as to officers and employees of the departments of city government which they head. Presentation and allowance of claims as provided by law for claims of other character is not required for payment of salaries and wages embraced in a verified payroll.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 209; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-209; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-4-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to conflicts of interests, partisan political activities and unlawful campaign practices, see §

6-5-106

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 210, related to prohibited interests.

§ 15-4-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to annual state examination and report, see §

9-1-507

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 211, related to monthly financial statements of governing bodies and annual state examinations of those statements.

§ 15-4-109.
Finances; first commission's appropriative powers.

The first commission elected in a city under the provisions of this article has the power, by ordinance, to revise, repeal or change any appropriations made for the current fiscal year prior to the beginning of their term of office and to make additional appropriations.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 212; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-212; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-4-110.
Recall of officers.

Any elected officer may be removed at any time by the qualified electors in the following manner: a petition signed by at least twenty-five percent (25%) of all the registered electors and demanding an election of a successor of the person sought to be removed shall be filed with the city clerk. The petition shall contain a general statement of the grounds for removal. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one (1) paper, but each signer shall add to his signature his place of residence, giving the street and number. One (1) of the signers of each paper shall make oath before a competent officer that the statements therein made are true as he believes, and that each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be. Within ten (10) days from the date of filing the petition the clerk shall determine whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified electors. If necessary, the commission shall allow him extra help for that purpose. The clerk shall attach to the petition his certificate, showing the result of his examination. If the petition is insufficient, it shall be returned to the person who filed it, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition to the same effect. If the petition is sufficient, the clerk shall submit it to the governing body without delay. The governing body shall then fix a date for holding the election, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than forty (40) days from the date of the clerk’s certificate of sufficiency. The commission shall publish notice and arrange for holding the election, which shall be conducted in the same manner as other city elections.

Any person sought to be removed may be a candidate to succeed himself, and unless he requests otherwise in writing at least ten (10) days prior to the date of the special primary election, the clerk shall place his name on the official ballot without nomination. On the second Tuesday preceding the date fixed for the special election, a special primary election for the selection of candidates shall be held. The special primary election and nomination are governed by the provisions of this article. If the person sought to be removed is a candidate, one (1) opposing candidate shall be selected at the special primary election. The special primary election shall be held if there are more than two (2) nominees, one (1) of whom may be incumbent. If there are no candidates nominated against the officer sought to be removed, no special election will be held and the incumbent shall continue in office.

In any removal election the candidate receiving the highest number of votes is elected. The incumbent shall be removed from office upon the qualification of his successor, who shall hold office during the unexpired portion of the term for which his predecessor was elected. If the person who receives the highest number of votes fails to qualify within ten (10) days after receiving notification of election the office is vacant. This method of removal is in addition to any other methods provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 215; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-215; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of particular charges as affecting enforceability of recall petition, 114 ALR5th 1.

Sufficiency of technical and procedural aspects of recall petitions, 116 ALR5th 1.